Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Artificial intelligence companion”  means a system that uses artificial intelligence,
generative artificial intelligence or  algorithms that recognize emotion from input and that
are designed to simulate a sustained, human-like platonic, intimate or  romantic relationship
or companionship with a user by:
(i) Retaining information from prior interactions or user  sessions and from user prefer-
ences to personalize  interactions with the user and facilitate ongoing engagement with the
artificial intelligence companion;
(ii) Asking unprompted or unsolicited  questions that are not direct responses to user
input and that suggest or concern emotional topics; and
(iii) Sustaining an ongoing dialog concerning matters that are personal to the user.
(B) “Artificial intelligence companion” does not include:
(i) Software that  operates solely for the purpose of customer service or support, assisting
or supporting patient or resident care services in a facility, education, financial  services or
education, business operations, productivity, information analysis, internal  research or
technical assistance, regardless of the software’s capability  to use natural language inputs
and generate natural language outputs;
(ii) Software incorporated into  a video game that is limited to providing interaction only
with the features of the video game, if the software does not respond to input on topics  such
as mental health, self-harm, sexually explicit conduct or other topics unrelated to  the fea-
tures of the video game; or
(iii) A  stand-alone consumer electronic device that functions as a speaker and voice
command interface or acts as a voice-activated virtual assistant.
(b) “Artificial intelligence companion platform” means a website, application or other
combination of software and hardware that allows or facilitates operation of  and interaction
with an artificial intelligence companion.
(c) “National 9-8-8 suicide and crisis  lifeline” means the crisis hotline that the federal
Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration,  or a successor agency, oper-
ates and makes available by telephone or by electronic means.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1546 (SB 1546-B) Page 1
(d) “Operator” means a person that  controls or makes an artificial intelligence compan-
ion or artificial intelligence companion platform available to users in this state.
(e) “Sexually explicit conduct” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.665.
(f) “Youthline”  means a service that the American Association for Suicidology, or a
successor organization, has accredited for the purpose  of providing youth peer support to
individuals who contact the network by telephone or electronic means.
(2) If a reasonable person that interacts with an artificial  intelligence companion or an
artificial intelligence companion platform would believe that  the person is interacting with
a natural person,  the operator shall provide on the artificial intelligence companion platform
a clear  and conspicuous notice that indicates that a user is interacting with artificially gen-
erated output and not a natural person.
(3)(a) An operator may not allow users  in this state access to an artificial intelligence
companion or artificial intelligence companion platform  unless the operator has a protocol
for using evidence-based methods for detecting input from the user that  consists of suicidal
ideation or  intent or self-harm ideation or intent and that prevents the provision of content
to the user that encourages suicidal ideation, suicide or self-harm in the user.
(b) The protocol described in paragraph (a) of this subsection at a minimum must:
(A) Require an artificial intelligence companion to provide a user that expresses suicidal
ideation or intent or self-harm ideation or intent with a referral to  and contact information
and hyperlink for the national 9-8-8 suicide and crisis  lifeline and, if the operator identifies
the user as a person  who is under 25 years of age, allow the artificial intelligence companion
to alternatively provide a referral to and contact information  and hyperlink for a youthline;
and
(B) Use clinical  best practices and expertise to establish how the artificial intelligence
companion provides additional intervention for a user  who continues to express suicidal
ideation or intent or self-harm ideation or intent even after the artificial intelligence  com-
panion provides referrals to and contact information for the resources identified  in subpar-
agraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) An operator shall  publish on the operator’s website the details of the operator’s pro-
tocol.
(4)(a) If  an operator knows or has reason to believe that a user of the operator’s artificial
intelligence companion or artificial intelligence companion platform is a minor, the  operator
shall undertake reasonable measures to prevent the  artificial intelligence companion from
generating statements that would  lead a reasonable person to believe that the person is
interacting with another natural person, including statements that:
(A) Explicitly claim that the artificial intelligence companion is sentient or human;
(B) Simulate emotional dependence on the user;
(C) Simulate romantic interest or are sexual innuendo; or
(D) Role-play romantic relationships between adults and minors.
(b) In the circumstances  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the operator shall
cause the artificial intelligence companion to:
(A) Disclose to the user that the user is interacting with artificially generated output;
(B) Provide a clear and conspicuous reminder  at a minimum of every three hours of
interaction that the user should take a break from interactions  with the artificial intelli-
gence companion or artificial intelligence companion platform,  along with a further reminder
that the user is interacting with artificially generated output; and
(C) Use reasonable  measures to ensure that the artificial intelligence companion or ar-
tificial intelligence companion  platform does not produce visual representations of sexually
explicit conduct or suggest or state that the minor  should engage in sexually explicit con-
duct.
(c) In the circumstances described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, an  operator must
undertake reasonable measures to prevent an artificial intelligence companion from:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1546 (SB 1546-B) Page 2
(A) Delivering to a user, either on a variable  schedule or otherwise, a system of rewards
or affirmations with the  purpose of reinforcing behavior or maximizing the time during
which the user engages with the artificial intelligence companion;
(B) Generating in response to a user’s indication of a desire to end a conversation,  re-
duce engagement time or delete the user’s account unsolicited  messages of simulated emo-
tional distress, loneliness or abandonment or otherwise  attempt to arouse guilt or sympathy
in the user; or
(C) Making a material misrepresentation about the artificial intelligence  companion’s
identity, capabilities or training data or about whether the user is interacting with arti-
ficially generated output, including when the user directly questions the artificial intelligence
companion about any of these topics.
(5)(a) Not later  than December 31 of each year, an operator shall post on a publicly ac-
cessible website a report that discloses:
(A) The number of times during the calendar year preceding the report in which the op-
erator provided a referral under subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) The details of the operator’s protocol under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) An operator may  not include in the report described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section any personal information that identifies an individual.
SECTION 2.
(1) An individual who suffers an  ascertainable loss of money or property or
other injury in fact as a  result of an operator’s violation of section 1 of this 2026 Act may
bring an action in a court of this state to recover:
(a) The greater  of the individual’s actual damages or statutory damages of $1,000 for each
violation; and
(b) An injunction to prevent or restrain the violation.
(2) A court may award a prevailing plaintiff attorney fees and costs  in an action under
this section.
(3) Relief or a recovery under this section does not relieve an operator of  any duty,
remedy or obligation to which the operator is subject under other applicable law.
Passed by Senate February 19, 2026
Repassed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1546 (SB 1546-B) Page 3